Hawaii statutes.
D. Western Regional Education Compact

[§304A-3201] Approval of compact. The
Western Regional Education Compact, recommended by the Western Governors'
Conference on November 10, 1950, for adoption by the states of Arizona,
California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah,
Washington, Wyoming, the then Territory of Alaska and the Territory of Hawaii,
is hereby certified and approved and the adherence of the State of Hawaii to
this compact is hereby declared by the legislature of the State of Hawaii. [L
2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Note

The recodification of this Compact to this chapter is not the
"appropriate legislation" or "requisite legislative action"
to initiate a withdrawal by this State from the Compact. L 2006, c 75, §21.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next